South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S925.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the State Board of Financial Institutions, relating to Non-interest Bearing Negotiable Order of Withdrawal (NINOW) Accounts by State-chartered Savings and Loan Associations, designated as Regulation Document Number 5393, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina State Board of Financial Institutions proposes to repeal R.15-39D as unnecessary because Section 34-28-500 of the South Carolina Code already allows these types of accounts. ----XX----